California statutes. Labor Code
(B) The covered worker is advised by a health care provider to self-quarantine or self-isolate due to concerns related to COVID-19.

(C) The covered worker is prohibited from working by the covered worker’s hiring entity due to health concerns related to the potential transmission of COVID-19.

(2) A covered worker shall be entitled to the following number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave:

(A) A covered worker is entitled to 80 hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave, if the covered worker satisfies either of the following criteria:

(i) The hiring entity considers the covered worker to work “full time.”

(ii) The covered worker worked or was scheduled to work, on average, at least 40 hours per week for the hiring entity in the two weeks preceding the date the covered worker took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a covered worker who is an active firefighter who was scheduled to work more than 80 hours for the hiring entity in the two weeks preceding the date the covered worker took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave equal to the total number of hours that the covered worker was scheduled to work for the hiring entity in those two preceding weeks. This subparagraph applies to an active firefighting member of any of the following:

(i) A fire department of a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision.

(ii) A fire department of the University of California and the California State University.

(iii) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(iv) A county forestry or firefighting department or unit.

(v) A fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and whose firefighters are certified by the United States Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters.

(vi) A fire department that serves a National Aeronautics and Space Administration
 installation and that adheres to training standards established in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 13155) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

(vii) A fire department that provides fire protection to a commercial airport regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) under Part 139 (commencing with Section 139.1) of Subchapter G of Chapter 1 of Title 14 of the Federal Code of Regulations whose firefighters are trained and certified by the State Fire Marshal as meeting the standards of Fire Control 5 and Section 139.319 of Title 14 of the Federal Code of Regulations.

(viii) Fire and rescue services coordinators who work for the Office of Emergency Services. For purposes of this clause, “fire and rescue services coordinators” means coordinators with any of the following job classifications: coordinator, senior coordinator,
 or chief coordinator.

(C) A covered worker who does not satisfy either of the criteria in subparagraph (A) or (B) is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as follows:

(i) If the covered worker has a normal weekly schedule, the total number of hours the covered worker is normally scheduled to work for the hiring entity over two weeks.

(ii) If the covered worker works a variable number of hours, 14 times the average number of hours the covered worker worked each day for the hiring entity in the six months preceding the date the covered worker took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave. If the covered worker has worked for the hiring entity over a period of fewer than six months but more than 14 days, this calculation shall instead be made over the entire period the covered worker has worked for
 the hiring entity.

(iii) If the covered worker works a variable number of hours and has worked for the hiring entity over a period of 14 days or fewer, the total number of hours the covered worker has worked for that hiring entity.

(D) The total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which a covered worker is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) shall be in addition to any paid sick leave that may be available to the covered worker under Section 246.

(E) A covered worker may determine how many hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to use, up to the total number of hours to which the covered worker is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C). The hiring entity shall make COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave available for immediate use by the covered worker, upon
 the oral or written request of the worker to the hiring entity.

(F) A hiring entity is not required to provide a covered worker more than the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered worker is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C).

(3) (A) Each hour of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave shall be compensated at a rate equal to the highest of the following:

(i) The covered worker’s regular rate of pay for the covered worker’s last pay period, including pursuant to any collective bargaining agreement that applies.

(ii) The state minimum wage.

(iii) The local minimum wage to which the covered worker is
 entitled.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a covered worker who is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), shall be compensated for each hour of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave at the regular rate of pay to which the worker would be entitled as if the worker had been scheduled to work those hours, pursuant to existing law or an applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) or (B), a hiring entity shall not be required to pay more than five hundred eleven dollars ($511) per day and five thousand one hundred ten dollars ($5,110) in the aggregate to a covered worker for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave taken by the worker.

(4) A hiring entity shall not require a covered worker to use any other paid or
 unpaid leave, paid time off, or vacation time provided by the hiring entity to the covered worker before the covered worker uses COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave or in lieu of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if a hiring entity already provides a covered worker with a supplemental benefit, such as supplemental paid leave, that is payable for the reasons listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and that would compensate the covered worker in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered worker is entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), then the hiring entity may count the hours of the other paid benefit or leave towards the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave that the hiring entity is required to provide to the covered worker under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). For
 purposes of the foregoing, the other supplemental paid benefit or leave that may be counted does not include paid sick leave to which the covered worker is entitled under Section 246, but may include paid leave already provided by the hiring entity pursuant to Executive Order N-51-20 or Section 248, or supplemental paid leave provided pursuant to federal or local law for the same reasons set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b). Additionally, if a hiring entity already provided supplemental paid leave between March 4, 2020, and the effective date of this section for the reasons listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) but did not compensate the covered worker in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered worker is entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the employer may retroactively provide supplemental pay to the covered worker to satisfy the compensation requirements under paragraph (3) of
 subdivision (b), in which case those hours may count towards the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(d) (1) In addition to other remedies as may be provided by the laws of this state or its subdivisions, including, but not limited to, the remedies available to redress any unlawful business practice under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, the Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section. For purposes of such enforcement and to implement COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave, this section shall apply as follows:

(A) The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section as if COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave constitutes “paid sick days,” “paid sick leave,” or “sick leave” under subdivisions (i) and (n) of Section
 246, subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 246.5, Section 247, Section 247.5, and Section 248.5. However, the requirement in subdivision (i) of Section 246 is not enforceable until the next full pay period following the date of enactment of this section.

(B) Section 249 applies to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(C) By seven days after the effective date of this section, the Labor Commissioner shall make publicly available a model notice for purposes of Section 247. Only for purposes of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave, if a hiring entity’s covered workers do not frequent a workplace, the hiring entity may satisfy the notice requirement of subdivision (a) of Section 247 by disseminating notice through electronic means, such as by electronic mail.

(2) For purposes of sections of this code cited in
 subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1), in construing this section all covered workers shall be considered employees and any hiring entity shall be considered an employer.

(e) The requirement to provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section shall take effect not later than 10 days after the date of enactment of this section.

(f) The requirement to provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section shall expire on December 31, 2020, or upon the expiration of any federal extension of the Emergency Paid Sick Leave Act established by the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127), whichever is later, except that a covered worker taking COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave at the time of the expiration of this section shall be permitted to take the full amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid
 sick leave to which that covered worker otherwise would have been entitled under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 45, Sec. 4.   (AB 1867)   Effective September 9, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

248.2.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave” means supplemental paid sick leave provided pursuant to this section.

(2) “Employer” means an employer, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 245.5, that employs more than 25 employees.

(3) “Covered employee” means an employee who is unable to work or telework for an employer because of a reason listed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(4) “Firefighter” means an active firefighting member of any of the following:

(A) A fire department of a city, county, city and county, district, or other public or municipal corporation or political subdivision.

(B) A fire department of the University of California and the California State University.

(C) The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(D) A county forestry or firefighting department or unit.

(E) A fire department that serves a United States Department of Defense installation and whose firefighters are certified by the United States Department of Defense as meeting its standards for firefighters.

(F) A fire department that serves a National Aeronautics and Space Administration installation and that adheres to training standards
 established in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 13155) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

(G) A fire department that provides fire protection to a commercial airport regulated by the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) under Part 139 (commencing with Section 139.1) of Subchapter G of Chapter 1 of Title 14 of the Federal Code of Regulations whose firefighters are trained and certified by the State Fire Marshal as meeting the standards of Fire Control 5 and Section 139.319 of Title 14 of the Federal Code of Regulations.

(H) Fire and rescue services coordinators who work for the Office of Emergency Services. For purposes of this clause, “fire and rescue services coordinators” means coordinators with any of the following job classifications: coordinator, senior coordinator, or chief coordinator.

(b) A covered employee shall be entitled to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as follows:

(1) An employer shall provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to each covered employee if that covered employee is unable to work or telework due to any of the following reasons:

(A) The covered employee is subject to a quarantine or isolation period related to COVID-19 as defined by an order or guidelines of the State Department of Public Health, the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or a local health officer who has jurisdiction over the workplace. If the covered employee is subject to more than one of the foregoing, the covered employee shall be permitted to use COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave for the minimum quarantine or isolation period under the order or guidelines that provides for the
 longest such minimum period.

(B) The covered employee has been advised by a health care provider to self-quarantine due to concerns related to COVID-19.

(C) The covered employee is attending an appointment to receive a vaccine for protection against contracting COVID-19.

(D) The covered employee is experiencing symptoms related to a COVID-19 vaccine that prevent the employee from being able to work or telework.

(E) The covered employee is experiencing symptoms of COVID-19 and seeking a medical diagnosis.

(F) The covered employee is caring for a family member, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 245.5, who is subject to an order or guidelines described in subparagraph (A) or who has
 been advised to self-quarantine, as described in subparagraph (B).

(G) The covered employee is caring for a child, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 245.5, whose school or place of care is closed or otherwise unavailable for reasons related to COVID-19 on the premises.

(2) A covered employee shall be entitled to the following number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave:

(A) A covered employee is entitled to 80 hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave, if the covered employee satisfies either of the following criteria:

(i) The employer considers the covered employee to work full time.

(ii) The covered employee worked or was scheduled to work, on average, at least
 40 hours per week for the employer in the two weeks preceding the date the covered employee took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a covered employee who is a firefighter who was scheduled to work more than 80 hours for the employer in the two weeks preceding the date the covered employee took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave equal to the total number of hours that the covered employee was scheduled to work for the employer in those two preceding weeks.

(C) A covered employee who does not satisfy the criteria in subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B) is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as follows:

(i) If the covered employee has a normal weekly schedule, the total number of
 hours the covered employee is normally scheduled to work for the employer over two weeks.

(ii) If the covered employee works a variable number of hours, 14 times the average number of hours the covered employee worked each day for the employer in the six months preceding the date the covered employee took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave. If the covered employee has worked for the employer over a period of fewer than six months but more than 14 days, this calculation shall instead be made over the entire period the covered employee has worked for the employer.

(iii) If the covered employee works a variable number of hours and has worked for the employer over a period of 14 days or fewer, the total number of hours the covered employee has worked for that employer.

(D) The total number of hours of COVID-19
 supplemental paid sick leave to which a covered employee is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) shall be in addition to any paid sick leave that may be available to the covered employee under Section 246.

(E) A covered employee may determine how many hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to use, up to the total number of hours to which the covered employee is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph. The employer shall make COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave available for immediate use by the covered employee, upon the oral or written request of the covered employee to the employer.

(F) An employer is not required to provide a covered employee more than the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered employee is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph.

(3) (A) Each hour of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave shall be compensated at a rate equal to the following:

(i) For nonexempt covered employees, by the highest of the following:

(I) Calculated in the same manner as the regular rate of pay for the workweek in which the covered employee uses COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave, whether or not the employee actually works overtime in that workweek.

(II) Calculated by dividing the covered employee’s total wages, not including overtime premium pay, by the employee’s total hours worked in the full pay periods of the prior 90 days of employment.

(III) The state minimum wage.

(IV) The local minimum wage to which the covered employee is entitled.

(ii) COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave for exempt covered employees shall be calculated in the same manner as the employer calculates wages for other forms of paid leave time.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a covered employee who is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), shall be compensated for each hour of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave at the regular rate of pay to which the covered employee would be entitled as if the covered employee had been scheduled to work those hours, pursuant to existing law or an applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) or (B), an employer
 shall not be required to pay more than five hundred eleven dollars ($511) per day and five thousand one hundred ten dollars ($5,110) in the aggregate to a covered employee for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave taken by the covered employee unless federal legislation is enacted that increases these amounts beyond the amounts that were included in the Emergency Paid Sick Leave Act established by the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127), in which case the new federal dollar amounts shall apply to this section as of the date the new amounts are applicable under the federal law. Nothing in this subparagraph shall prevent a covered employee who has reached the maximum amounts, as set forth herein, from choosing to utilize other paid leave that is available to the covered employee in order to fully compensate the covered employee for leave taken.

(4) An employer shall not require a covered employee to use any other
 paid or unpaid leave, paid time off, or vacation time provided by the employer to the covered employee before the covered employee uses COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave or in lieu of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, in order to satisfy the requirement to maintain an employee’s earnings when an employee is excluded from the workplace due to COVID-19 exposure under the Cal-OSHA COVID-19 Emergency Temporary Standards at Sections 3205 through 3205.4, inclusive, of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations or the Cal-OSHA Aerosol Transmissible Diseases Standard at Section 5199 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, an employer may require a covered employee to first exhaust their COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave under this section.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if an employer pays a covered
 employee another supplemental benefit for leave taken on or after January 1, 2021, that is payable for the reasons listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and that compensates the covered employee in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered employee is entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), then the employer may count the hours of the other paid benefit or leave towards the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave that the employer is required to provide to the covered employee under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). For purposes of the foregoing, the other supplemental benefit for leave taken that may be counted does not include paid sick leave to which the covered employee is entitled under Section 246, subdivision (e) of Section 248, or subdivision (f) of Section 248.1 but may include paid leave provided by the employer pursuant to any federal or local law in effect or that
 became effective on or after January 1, 2021, if the paid leave is provided to the covered employee under that law for any of the same reasons set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) In addition to other remedies as may be provided by the laws of this state or its subdivisions, including, but not limited to, the remedies available to redress any unlawful business practice under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, the Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section. For purposes of enforcement and to implement COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave, this section shall apply as follows:

(1) The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this section as if COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave constitutes “paid sick days,” “paid sick leave,” or “sick leave” under subdivisions (i) and (n) of Section 246, subdivisions
 (b) and (c) of Section 246.5, Section 247, Section 247.5, and Section 248.5.

(2) For purposes of the enforcement of subdivision (i) of Section 246 as it relates to this section:

(A) COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave shall be set forth separately from paid sick days.

(B) The requirement in subdivision (i) of Section 246 is not enforceable until the next full pay period following the date that this section takes effect.

(C) When covered employees have schedules described in clauses (ii) and (iii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), an employer may meet the requirement of subdivision (i) of Section 246 for such covered employees by doing an initial calculation of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave available and indicating
 “(variable)” next to that calculation. This, however, does not exempt an employer from providing a covered employee an updated calculation when such a covered employee requests to use COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave or requests relevant records under Section 247.5.

(3) Section 249 applies to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(4) By seven days after the date of enactment of this section, the Labor Commissioner shall make publicly available a model notice for purposes of Section 247. Only for purposes of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave, if an employer’s covered employees do not frequent a workplace, the employer may satisfy the notice requirement of subdivision (a) of Section 247 by disseminating notice through electronic means, such as by electronic mail.

(e) (1) The requirement
 to provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section shall take effect 10 days after the date of enactment of this section, at which time the requirements shall apply retroactively to January 1, 2021.

(2) The requirement to provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section applies retroactively to January 1, 2021, in order to protect the economic well-being of covered employees who took leave for the reasons listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) beginning on or after January 1, 2021, when the requirements in Sections 248, 248.1, and the Emergency Paid Sick Leave Act established by the federal Families First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127) expired, and before the effective date of this section.

(A) For any such leave taken, if the employer did not compensate the covered employee in an amount equal to or greater
 than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered employee is entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), then upon the oral or written request of the employee, the employer shall provide the covered employee with a retroactive payment that provides for such compensation.

(B) For any such retroactive payment, the number of hours of leave corresponding to the amount of the retroactive payment shall count towards the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave that the employer is required to provide to the covered employee under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(C) This retroactive payment shall be paid on or before the payday for the next full pay period after the oral or written request of the covered employee. The retroactive payment shall be reflected on the written notice required by
 subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) for the corresponding pay period.

(D) The requirement to provide a retroactive payment under this subdivision is in addition to the requirements in subdivision (e) of Section 248 and subdivision (f) of Section 248.1 that a covered employee taking COVID-19 food sector supplemental paid sick leave or COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave at the time of the expiration of those sections shall be permitted to take the full amount of such supplemental paid sick leave to which that covered employee otherwise would have been entitled under those sections.

(f) The requirement to provide COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section shall remain in effect through September 30, 2021, except that a covered employee taking COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave at the time of the expiration of this section shall be
 permitted to take the full amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the covered employee otherwise would have been entitled under this section.

(g) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(h) The provisions of this section shall not apply to providers of in-home supportive services under Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956 of, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, or waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 13, Sec. 1.   (SB 95)   Effective March 19, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

248.3.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave” means supplemental paid sick leave provided pursuant to this section.

(2) “Provider” or “providers” means a provider of in-home supportive services under Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956 of, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, or waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) “Work” or “worked” means providing authorized in-home supportive services under Section 14132.95, 14132.952, or 14132.956
 of, or Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9 of, the Welfare and Institutions Code, or waiver personal care services pursuant to Section 14132.97 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to an eligible recipient.

(b) A provider shall be entitled to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as follows:

(1) COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave shall be available to a provider if that provider is unable to work due to any of the following reasons:

(A) The provider is subject to a quarantine or isolation period related to COVID-19 as defined by an order or guidelines of the State Department of Public Health, the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or a local health officer who has jurisdiction over the workplace. If the provider is subject to more than one of the
 foregoing, the provider shall be permitted to use COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave for the minimum quarantine or isolation period under the order or guidelines that provides for the longest minimum period.

(B) The provider has been advised by a health care provider to self-quarantine due to concerns related to COVID-19.

(C) The provider is attending an appointment to receive a vaccine for protection against contracting COVID-19.

(D) The provider is experiencing symptoms related to a COVID-19 vaccine that prevents the provider from being able to work.

(E) The provider is experiencing symptoms of COVID-19 and seeking a medical diagnosis.

(F) The provider is caring for a family member,
 as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 245.5, who is subject to an order or guidelines described in subparagraph (A) or who has been advised to self-quarantine, as described in subparagraph (B).

(G) The provider is caring for a child, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 245.5, whose school or place of care is closed or otherwise unavailable for reasons related to COVID-19 on the premises.

(2) A provider shall be entitled to the following number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave:

(A) A provider is entitled to 80 hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave if the provider worked or was scheduled to work, on average, at least 40 hours per week in the two weeks preceding the date the provider took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(B) A provider who does not satisfy the criteria in subparagraph (A) is entitled to an amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as follows, up to a maximum of 80 hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave:

(i) If the provider has a regular weekly schedule, the total number of hours the provider is normally scheduled to work over two weeks.

(ii) If the provider works a variable number of hours, 14 times the average number of hours the provider worked each day for the employer in the six months preceding the date the provider took COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave. If the provider has worked over a period of fewer than six months but more than 14 days, this calculation shall instead be made over the entire period the provider has worked.

(iii) If the provider works a variable number of hours
 and has worked over a period of 14 days or fewer, the total number of hours the provider has worked.

(C) The total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which a provider is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) shall be determined on the first day that the provider uses COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave under this section and shall be in addition to any paid sick leave that may be available to the provider under Section 246.

(D) A provider may determine how many hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to use, up to the total number of hours to which the provider is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B). The COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave is available for immediate use by the provider, and the provider shall inform the recipient of the need to take sick leave and submit a sick leave claim to the county consistent with
 established procedures in that county.

(E) A provider is not entitled to more than the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the provider is entitled pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B).

(3) Each hour of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave shall be compensated at the regular rate of pay to which the provider would be entitled if the provider had been scheduled to work those hours pursuant to existing law or an applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(4) A provider shall not be required to use any other paid or unpaid leave before the provider uses COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave or in lieu of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if a provider takes paid leave on or
 after April 1, 2021, that is payable for the reasons listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) that compensates the provider in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the provider is entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the hours of the other paid benefit or leave may be counted towards the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the provider is entitled under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). For purposes of the foregoing, the other supplemental benefit for leave taken that may be counted does not include paid sick leave to which the provider may be entitled to under Section 246, but may include paid leave provided by any federal or local law that becomes effective on or after April 1, 2021, if the paid leave is provided to the provider under that law for any of the same reasons set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(d) (1) The entitlement to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section shall take effect 10 days after the date of enactment of this section, at which time the entitlements shall apply retroactively to January 1, 2021.

(2) The entitlement to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section applies retroactively to January 1, 2021.

(A) For any such leave taken, if the provider was not compensated in an amount equal to or greater than the amount of compensation for COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the provider is entitled as set forth under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), then the provider shall be entitled to a retroactive payment that provides for such compensation.

(B) For any such retroactive payment, the number of hours of
 leave corresponding to the amount of the retroactive payment shall count towards the total number of hours of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave that the provider is entitled to under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(C) The COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave provided under this section is in addition to any unused sick leave benefits put in place by the federal Family First Coronavirus Response Act (Public Law 116-127), which a provider may still use until March 31, 2021.

(e) The entitlement to COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave as set forth in this section shall remain in effect through September 30, 2021, except that a provider taking COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave at the time of the expiration of this section shall be permitted to take the full amount of COVID-19 supplemental paid sick leave to which the provider otherwise would have been entitled under this
 section.

(f) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, without taking any regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 13, Sec. 2.   (SB 95)   Effective March 19, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

248.5.

(a) The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this article, including investigating an alleged violation, and ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate the violation or to maintain the status quo pending the completion of a full investigation or hearing through the procedures set forth in Sections 98, 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, or 1197.1, including by issuance of a citation against an employer who violates this article, and by filing a civil action. If a citation is issued, the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner shall be the same as those set out in Section 98.74 or 1197.1, as appropriate.

(b) (1) If the Labor Commissioner, in any administrative proceeding
 under subdivision (a), determines that a violation of this article has occurred, they may order any appropriate relief, including reinstatement, backpay, the payment of sick days unlawfully withheld, and the payment of an additional sum in the form of an administrative penalty to an employee or other person whose rights under this article were violated.

(2) If paid sick days were unlawfully withheld, the dollar amount of paid sick days withheld from the employee multiplied by three, or two hundred fifty dollars ($250), whichever amount is greater, but not to exceed an aggregate penalty of four thousand dollars ($4,000), shall be included in the administrative penalty.

(3) If a violation of this article results in other harm to the employee or person, such as discharge from employment, or otherwise results in a violation of the rights of the employee or person, the administrative
 penalty shall include a sum of fifty dollars ($50) for each day or portion thereof that the violation occurred or continued, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(c) Where prompt compliance by an employer is not forthcoming, the Labor Commissioner may take any appropriate enforcement action to secure compliance, including the filing of a civil action. In compensation to the state for the costs of investigating and remedying the violation, the commissioner may order the violating employer to pay to the state a sum of not more than fifty dollars ($50) for each day or portion of a day a violation occurs or continues for each employee or other person whose rights under this article were violated.

(d) An employee or other person may report to the Labor Commissioner a suspected violation of this article. The commissioner shall encourage reporting
 pursuant to this subdivision by keeping confidential, to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, the name and other identifying information of the employee or person reporting the violation. However, the commissioner may disclose that person’s name and identifying information as necessary to enforce this article or for other appropriate purposes, upon the authorization of that person.
